Washington statutes.
RCW 43.117.020

Definitions.

As used in this chapter unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1) "Asian Pacific Americans" include persons of Japanese, Chinese, Filipino, Korean, Samoan, Guamanian, Thai, Vietnamese, Cambodian, Laotian, and other South East Asian, South Asian, and Pacific Island ancestry.

(2) "Commission" means the Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs in the office of the governor.

[ 1995 c 67 s 3; 1974 ex.s. c 140 s 2.]